test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex-der-kavnad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - kavnâđ: # MLO, checked

    kavnâđ+V+Inf: kavnuđ
    kavnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kavnuum
    kavnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kávnoo
    kavnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kávnojeen
    kavnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kávnojeh
    kavnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kavnuu
    kavnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kávnojim
    kavnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kavnui
    kavnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kávnojii
    kavnâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kavnâstâm
    kavnâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kaavnâst
    kavnâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kavnâsteen
    kavnâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kavnâsteh
    kavnâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kaavnâst
    kavnâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kavnâstim
    kavnâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:  kavnâstij
    kavnâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:  kavnâstii
    kavnâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:  kavnâdâm
    kavnâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:  kaavnâd
    kavnâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du1:  kavnâdeen
    kavnâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:  kavnâdeh
    kavnâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:  kaavnâd
    kavnâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1:  kavnâdim
    kavnâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:  kavnâdij
    kavnâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:  kavnâdii
    kavnâđ+V+Der/t+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:  kavnâttâm
    kavnâđ+V+Der/t+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:  kaavnât
    kavnâđ+V+Der/t+V+Ind+Prs+Du1:  kavnâtteen
    kavnâđ+V+Der/t+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:  kavnâtteh
    kavnâđ+V+Der/t+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:  kaavnât
    kavnâđ+V+Der/t+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1:  kavnâttim
    kavnâđ+V+Der/t+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:  kavnâttij
    kavnâđ+V+Der/t+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:  kavnâttii
    kavnâđ+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kavnâlâm
    kavnâđ+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kavnâl
    kavnâđ+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kavnâleen
    kavnâđ+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kavnâleh
    kavnâđ+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kavnâl
    kavnâđ+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kavnâlim
    kavnâđ+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kavnâlij
    kavnâđ+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kavnâlii
    kavnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:  kavnâškuáđám
    kavnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:  kavnâškuát
    kavnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+Du1:  kavnâškyetteen
    kavnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:  kavnâškyeteh
    kavnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:  kavnâškyetih
    kavnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:  kavnâškyeđe
    kavnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1:  kavnâškuottim
    kavnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:  kavnâškuođij
    kavnâđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:  kavnâškuottii
